California statutes. Corporations Code
(b) Summons or other process against a dissolved corporation may be served by delivering a copy thereof to an officer, director, or person having charge of its assets or, if that person cannot be found, to any agent upon whom process might be served at the time of dissolution. If none of these persons can be found with
 due diligence and it is so shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court, then the court may make an order that summons or other process be served upon the dissolved corporation by personally delivering a copy thereof, together with a copy of the order, to the Secretary of State or an assistant or deputy secretary of state.

(c) Every dissolved corporation shall survive and continue to exist indefinitely for the purpose of being sued in any quiet title action. Any judgment rendered in any quiet title action shall bind each and all of its members or other persons having any equity or other interest in that corporation, to the extent of their interest therein, and that action shall have the same force and effect as an action brought under the provisions of Sections 410.50 and 410.60 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Service of summons or other process in any quiet title action may be made as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section
 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure or as provided in subdivision (b).

(d) Upon receipt of that process and the fee therefor, the Secretary of State forthwith shall give notice to the corporation as provided in Section 1702.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 33.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

12663.

Without the approval of 100 percent of the members, any contrary provision in this part or the articles or bylaws notwithstanding, so long as there is any lot, parcel, area, apartment or unit for which an owners’ association, created in connection with any of the forms of development referred to in Section 11004.5 of the Business and Professions Code, is obligated to provide management, maintenance, preservation, or control, the following shall apply:

(a) The owners’ association or any person acting on its behalf shall not do either of the following:

(1) Transfer all or substantially all of its assets.

(2) File a certificate of dissolution.

(b) No court shall enter an order declaring the owners’ association duly wound up and dissolved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Crimes and Penalties [12670. - 12679.]

12670.

(a) Upon the failure of a corporation to file the statement required by Section 12570, the Secretary of State shall provide a notice of that delinquency to the corporation. The notice shall also contain information concerning the application of this section, and shall advise the corporation of the penalty imposed by Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for failure to timely file the required statement after notice of delinquency has been provided by the Secretary of State. If, within 60 days after providing notice of the delinquency, a statement pursuant to Section 12570 has not been filed by the corporation, the Secretary of State shall certify the name of the corporation to the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) Upon
 certification pursuant to subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board shall assess against the corporation a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) pursuant to Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) The penalty herein provided shall not apply to a corporation which on or prior to the date of certification pursuant to subdivision (a) has dissolved, has been converted to another type of business entity, or has been merged into another corporation or other business entity.

(d) The penalty herein provided shall not apply and the Secretary of State need not provide a notice of the delinquency to a corporation the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of which have been suspended by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on or prior to, and remain suspended on, the last day of the filing period pursuant to Section
 12570. The Secretary of State need not provide notice of the filing requirement pursuant to Section 12570, to a corporation the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of which have been so suspended by the Franchise Tax Board on or prior to, and remain suspended on, the day the Secretary of State prepares the notice for sending.

(e) If, after certification pursuant to subdivision (a) the Secretary of State finds the required statement was filed before the expiration of the 60-day period after providing notice of the delinquency, the Secretary of State shall promptly decertify the name of the corporation to the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board shall then promptly abate any penalty assessed against the corporation pursuant to Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) If the Secretary of State determines that the failure of a corporation to file a statement
 required by Section 12570 is excusable because of reasonable cause or unusual circumstances which justify the failure, the Secretary of State may waive the penalty imposed by this section and by Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, in which case the Secretary of State shall not certify the name of the corporation to the Franchise Tax Board, or if already certified, the Secretary of State shall promptly decertify the name of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 20.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12671.

Any promoter, director, or officer of a corporation who knowingly and willfully issues or consents to the issuance of memberships or membership certificates with intent to defraud present or future members or creditors is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in county jail for not more than one year or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12672.

Any director of any corporation who concurs in any vote or act of the directors of the corporation or any of them, knowingly and with dishonest or fraudulent purpose, to make any distribution of assets, except in the case and in the manner allowed by this part, either with the design of defrauding creditors or members or of giving a false appearance to the value of the membership and thereby defrauding purchasers is guilty of a crime. Each such crime is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 44.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

12673.

(a) Every director or officer of any corporation is guilty of a crime if such director or officer knowingly concurs in making or publishing, either generally or privately, to members or other persons (1) any materially false report or statement as to the financial condition of the corporation, or (2) any willfully or fraudulently exaggerated report, prospectus, account, or statement of operations, financial condition, or prospects, or (3) any other paper intended to give, and having a tendency to give, a membership in such corporation a greater or lesser value than it really possesses.

(b) Every director or officer of any corporation is guilty of a crime who refuses to make or direct to be made any book entry or the posting of any notice required by law in the manner required by law.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of this section shall be punishable by imprisonment in state prison or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12674.

(a) Every director, officer or agent of any corporation, who knowingly receives or acquires possession of any property of the corporation, otherwise than in payment of a just demand, and, with intent to defraud, omits to make, or to cause or direct to be made, a full and true entry thereof in the books or accounts of the corporation is guilty of a crime.

(b) Every director, officer, agent or member of any corporation who, with intent to defraud, destroys, alters, mutilates or falsifies any of the books, papers, writings, or securities belonging to the corporation or makes or concurs in omitting to make any material entry in any book of accounts or other record or document kept by the corporation is guilty of a crime.

(c) Each crime specified in this section is punishable by imprisonment in state prison, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not exceeding one year, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12675.

Every director, officer or agent of any corporation, or any person proposing to organize such a corporation who knowingly exhibits any false, forged, or altered book, paper, voucher, security, or other instrument of evidence to any public officer or board authorized by law to examine the organization of such corporation or to investigate its affairs, with intent to deceive such officer or board in respect thereto, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not exceeding one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 45.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

12676.

Every person who, without being authorized so to do, subscribes the name of another to or inserts the name of another in any prospectus, circular or other advertisement or announcement of any corporation, whether existing or intended to be formed, with intent to permit the document to be published and thereby to lead persons to believe that the person whose name is so subscribed is an officer, agent or promoter of such corporation, when in fact no such relationship exists to the knowledge of such person, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12677.

Nothing in this chapter limits the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime under any other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12678.

Any person may be enjoined from violating the provisions of Section 12311. Any corporation may be enjoined from carrying on business outside of the purpose for which it was formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12679.

Any person violating Section 12311, and any corporation carrying on business outside the purpose for which it was formed, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. Foreign Corporations [12680. - 12680.]

12680.

Foreign corporations transacting intrastate business shall comply with Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1, except as to matters specifically otherwise provided for in this part and except that Section 2115 shall not be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 187, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 20. Transition Provisions [12690. - 12704.]

12690.

As used in Sections 12690 to 12704, inclusive, of this part:

(a) “New law” means Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code enacted by the California Legislature during the 1981–82 Regular Session and operative January 1, 1984.

(b) “Prior law” means Part 2 (commencing with Section 12220) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code in effect on December 31, 1983.

(c) “Subject corporation” means any corporation described in subdivision (a) of Section 12202 and subject to the prior law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12691.

(a) The new law shall apply to all corporations which are incorporated on or after January 1, 1984, under Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of this division or which are expressly governed by Part 2 pursuant to a particular provision of this division or other specific statutory provision.

(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, the new law shall apply to all subject corporations and to all actions taken by the directors, officers, or members of such corporations, on or after January 1, 1984.

(c) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, all of the sections of the new law governing acts, contracts, or other transactions by a subject corporation or its directors, officers, or members, shall apply only to the acts, contracts, or transactions occurring on or after January 1, 1984, and the prior law shall govern acts, contracts, or transactions occurring before January 1, 1984.

(d) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, any vote or consent by the directors or members of a subject corporation prior to January 1, 1984, in accordance with the prior law, shall be effective in accordance with that law. If any certificate or document is required to be filed in any public office of this state relating to such vote or consent, it may be filed on or after January 1, 1984, in accordance with the prior law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12692.

(a) The provisions of Sections 12310 and 12313 of the new law relating to the contents of articles of incorporation do not apply to subject corporations unless and until an amendment of the articles is filed stating that the corporation elects to be governed by all of the provisions of the new law not otherwise applicable to it under this chapter.

(b) The amendment described in subdivision (a) may be adopted by the board alone, except that if such amendment makes any change in the articles other than conforming the statement of purposes of the subject corporation to Section 12310, deleting any references to the location of its principal office, deleting any statement of par value or any statement regarding the number of directors, or conforming any such statement to Section 12331 (subject to Section 12694), the amendment shall also be approved by the members (Section 12224) if such approval is otherwise required for the changes made.

(c) The amendment shall not name the corporation’s initial agent for service of process if a report required by Section 12570 has been filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.

Section 12320 of the new law shall apply to subject corporations, but any statement in the articles of these corporations prior to an amendment thereof pursuant to Section 12692, relating to the powers of the corporation, shall not be construed as a limitation unless it is expressly stated as such.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12694.

Subdivision (a) of Section 12353 of the new law shall apply to subject corporations, but the treasurer of these corporations shall be deemed to be the chief financial officer unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 50.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12695.

Section 12377 governs any proposed indemnification by a subject corporation after January 1, 1984, whether the events upon which the indemnification is based occurred before or after January 1, 1984. Any statement relating to indemnification contained in the articles or bylaws of a subject corporation shall not be construed as limiting the indemnification permitted by Section 12377, unless it is expressly stated as so intended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12696.

(a) The provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 12460) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 12480) of the new law shall apply to any meeting of members of a subject corporation, held on or after January 1, 1984, and to any action by such members pursuant to a written ballot, which becomes effective on or after January 1, 1984, and to any vote cast at such a meeting or ballot, given for such action, whether or not a ballot was executed by the member prior to January 1, 1984.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the prior law shall apply to any meeting of members and to any vote cast at such a meeting if the meeting was initially called for a date prior to January 1, 1984, and notice thereof was given to members entitled to vote at the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12697.

Section 12490 of the new law shall apply to actions commenced on or after January 1, 1984, with respect to a subject corporation. The prior law shall govern actions which are commenced prior to January 1, 1984, but are still pending on January 1, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12698.

Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 12520) and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 12530) of the new law shall apply to transactions consummated by a subject corporation on or after January 1, 1984, unless the approval required by the prior law has been given prior to January 1, 1984, or has been given on or after January 1, 1984, at a meeting of members initially called for a date prior to January 1, 1984, in which case the transaction shall be governed by the prior law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12699.

Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 12620) and Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 12650) of the new law shall apply to acts for involuntary dissolution of a subject corporation commenced on or after January 1, 1984. The prior law shall govern any of these actions which are commenced prior to January 1, 1984, but are still pending on January 1, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12700.

Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 12630) and Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 12650) of the new law shall apply to any voluntary dissolution proceeding initiated with respect to a subject corporation by the filing on or after January 1, 1984, of an election to wind up and dissolve. The prior law shall govern any of these proceedings so initiated prior to January 1, 1984.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12701.

When any corporate agent has been designated for service of process prior to January 1, 1984, and such designation of an agent included a name of a city, town, or village where the corporate agent maintained an office, service on such an agent may be effected at any office of the agent set forth in the certificate of the corporate agent filed pursuant to Section 1505, 6213, 8213, or 12573, or filed pursuant to Section 3301.5, 3301.6, 6403.5, or 6403.6 as in effect prior to January 1, 1977.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12702.

Any subject corporation that existed on the first day of January 1873, was formed under the laws of this state, and which has not already elected to continue its existence under the prior law, may at any time elect to continue its existence under the provisions of this code applicable thereto, (a) by the unanimous vote of all its directors, (b) by the vote of the members representing a majority of the voting power of the corporation at an election held at any annual meeting of the members or at any meeting called by the directors for the express purpose of considering this subject, or (c) by action of the directors upon the written consent of the members representing a majority of the voting power of the corporation.

A certificate of the action of the directors, signed by the directors and the secretary, shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State when the election is made by the unanimous vote of the directors or upon the written consent of the members. A certificate of the proceedings of the meeting of the members when the election is made at any such meeting, signed by the chairperson and secretary of the meeting and a majority of the directors, shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. Thereafter, the corporation shall continue its existence under the provisions of this code which are applicable thereto, and shall possess all the rights and powers, and shall be subject to all the obligations, restrictions, and limitations, prescribed thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 85.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12704.

If the corporate rights, privileges, and powers of a subject corporation have been suspended and are still suspended immediately prior to January 1, 1984 pursuant to the prior law, as a result of its incorporation of the General Nonprofit Corporation Law (commencing with Section 9000) in effect on December 31, 1979, and the incorporation by the General Nonprofit Corporation Law of Sections 5700 through 5908 of the prior law (Section 2300), such sections and provisions continue to apply to such corporation until restoration by the controller pursuant to such sections.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 3. FISH MARKETING [13200. - 13356.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [13200. - 13208.]

13200.

This part shall be known as “the Fish Marketing Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2261.)
-------------------------------------------

13201.

This part is enacted in order to promote, foster, and encourage the intelligent and orderly marketing of fish and fishery products through cooperation; to eliminate speculation and waste; to make the distribution of fish and fishery products between producer and consumer as direct as can be efficiently done; and to stabilize the marketing of fish and fishery products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2261.)
-------------------------------------------

13202.

As used in this part:

(a) “Fishery products” includes fish, crustaceans, mollusks, and marine products for human consumption.

(b) “Member” includes members of associations without capital stock and holders of common stock in associations organized with shares of stock.

(c) “Association” means any corporation organized under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2261.)
-------------------------------------------

13203.

Associations shall be deemed “nonprofit,” inasmuch as they are not organized to make profit for themselves, as such, or for their members, as such, but only for their members as producers of fishery products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13204.

The provisions of the General Corporation Law and all powers and rights thereunder, apply to associations, except where such provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the express provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2261.)
-------------------------------------------

13205.

No association is subject in any manner to the terms of the Corporate Securities Law and all associations may issue their membership certificates or stock or other securities as provided in this division without the necessity of any permit from the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 61.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13206.

An association shall be deemed not to be a conspiracy nor a combination in restraint of trade nor an illegal monopoly; nor an attempt to lessen competition or to fix prices arbitrarily or to create a combination or pool in violation of any law of the State; and the marketing contracts and agreements between the association and its members and any agreements authorized in this part shall be considered not to be illegal nor in restraint of trade nor contrary to the provisions of any statute enacted against pooling or combinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2261.)
-------------------------------------------

13207.

Any provisions of law which are in conflict with this part shall not be construed as applying to associations. Any exemptions under any laws applying to fishery products in the possession or under the control of the individual producer shall apply similarly and completely to such fishery products delivered by its members, in the possession or under the control of the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2261.)
-------------------------------------------

13208.

Any two or more associations may be merged into one such constituent association or consolidated into a new association. Such merger or consolidation shall be made in the manner prescribed by the General Corporation Law for domestic corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation, Articles, and By-laws [13220. - 13251.]



  ARTICLE 1. Formation [13220. - 13220.]

13220.

Five or more persons, a majority of whom are residents of this State, engaged in the production of fishery products, may form an association, with or without shares of stock, under the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Articles of Incorporation [13225. - 13230.]

13225.

Articles of incorporation shall be signed, acknowledged, and filed in the manner prescribed by the General Corporation Law for domestic corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13226.

The articles of incorporation shall state:

(a) The name of the association.

(b) The purposes for which it is formed.

(c) The county where the principal office for the transaction of business of the corporation is to be located.

(d) The number of directors thereof, which shall be not less than three and may be any number in excess thereof; the term of office of such directors; and the names and residence of those who are to serve as directors for the first year, or until election and qualification
 of their successors.

(e) The initial street address of the association.

(f) The initial mailing address of the association, if different from the initial street address.

(g) The name and street address in this state of the association’s initial agent for service of process in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1502.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 34.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13227.

If the association is organized with shares of stock, the articles shall state the number of shares which may be issued and if the shares are to have a par value, the par value of each share, and the aggregate par value of all shares; and if the shares are to be without par value it shall be so stated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13228.

If the shares are to be classified, the articles shall contain a description of the classes of shares and a statement of the number of shares of each kind or class and the nature and extent of the preferences, rights, privileges and restrictions granted to or imposed upon the holders of the respective classes of stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13229.

If the association is organized without shares of stock, the articles shall state whether the voting power and the property rights and interest of each member are equal or unequal; and if unequal the general rule or rules applicable to all members by which the voting power and the property rights and interests, respectively, of each member may be and are determined and fixed; and shall also provide for the admission of new members who shall be entitled to vote and to share in the property of the association with the old members, in accordance with such general rule or rules.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13230.

The articles of incorporation of any association may be altered or amended in the manner and for the purposes prescribed by the General Corporation Law for domestic corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. By-laws [13240. - 13251.]

13240.

Each association shall within 30 days after its incorporation, adopt for its government and management, a code of by-laws, not inconsistent with this part. A majority vote of the members or shares of stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote, or the written assent of a majority of the members or of stockholders representing a majority of all the shares of stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote, is necessary to adopt such by-laws and is effectual to repeal or amend any by-laws, or to adopt additional by-laws. The power to repeal and amend the by-laws, and adopt new by-laws, may, by a similar vote, or similar written assent, be delegated to the board of directors, which authority may, by a similar vote, or similar written assent, be revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2261.)
-------------------------------------------

13241.

The by-laws shall prohibit the transfer of the common stock or membership certificates of the associations to persons not engaged in the production of the products handled by the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13242.

The by-laws may provide:

(a) The number of members constituting a quorum.

(b) The right of members to vote by proxy or by mail or both, and the conditions, manner, form and effects of such votes; the right of members to cumulate their votes and the prohibition, if desired, of cumulative voting.

(c) The number of directors constituting a quorum.

(d) The qualifications, compensation and duties and term of office of directors and officers and the time of their election.

(e) Penalties for violations of the by-laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13243.

The by-laws may provide:

(a) The amount of entrance, organization and membership fees, if any; the manner and method of collection of the same; and the purposes for which they may be used.

(b) The amount which each member shall be required to pay annually, or from time to time, if at all, to carry on the business of the association; the charge, if any, to be paid by each member for services rendered by the association to him and the time of payment and the manner of collection; and the marketing contract between the association and its members which every member may be required to sign.

(c) The amount of any dividends which may be declared on the stock or membership capital, which dividends shall not exceed 8 percent per annum and which dividends shall be in the nature of interest and shall not affect the nonprofit character of any association organized hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13244.

The by-laws may provide:

(a) The number and qualification of members of the association and the conditions precedent to membership or ownership of common stock.

(b) The method, time and manner of permitting members to withdraw or the holders of common stock to transfer their stock.

(c) The manner of assignment and transfer of the interest of members and of the shares of common stock.

(d) The conditions upon which and time when membership of any member shall cease.

(e) For the automatic suspension of the rights of a member when he ceases to be eligible to membership in the association; and the mode, manner and effect of the expulsion of a member.

(f) The manner of determining the value of a member’s interest and provision for its purchase by the association upon the death or withdrawal of a member or upon the expulsion of a member or forfeiture of his membership, or at the option of the association, the purchase at a price fixed by conclusive appraisal by the board of directors; and the conditions and terms for the repurchase by the corporation from its stockholders of their stock upon their disqualification as stockholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13245.

The by-laws may provide for the time, place, and manner of calling and conducting meetings of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13246.

The by-laws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that directors shall be elected from the several districts. In such case, the by-laws shall specify the number of directors to be elected by each district, the manner and method of reapportioning the directors and of redistricting the territory covered by the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13247.

The by-laws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts, and that the directors shall be elected by representatives or advisers, who themselves have been elected by the members from the several territorial districts. In such case, the by-laws shall specify the number of representatives or advisers to be elected by each district, the manner and method of reapportioning the representatives or advisers and of redistricting the territory covered by the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13248.

The by-laws may provide that primary elections shall be held to nominate directors. Where the by-laws provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts, the by-laws may also provide that the results of the primary elections in the various districts shall be final and shall be ratified at the annual meeting of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13249.

The by-laws may provide that one or more directors may be nominated by any public official or commission or by the other directors selected by the members. Such directors shall represent primarily the interest of the general public in such associations. The directors so nominated need not be members of the association, but shall have the same powers and rights as other directors. Such directors shall not number more than one-fifth of the entire number of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13250.

The by-laws may provide that directors shall be elected for terms of from one to five years; provided, that at each annual election the same fraction of the total number of directors shall be elected as one year bears to the number of years of the term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13251.

The by-laws may provide for an executive committee and may allot to such committee all the functions and powers of the board of directors, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Officers [13275. - 13293.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [13275. - 13279.]

13275.

The affairs of the association shall be managed by a board of not less than three directors, elected by the members from their own number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13276.

Meetings of the board of directors may be held at any place within or without the State fixed by a quorum thereof unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or by-laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13277.

When a vacancy on the board of directors occurs other than by expiration of term, the remaining members of the board, by a majority vote, shall fill the vacancy, provided that when the by-laws provide for an election of directors by districts, the vacancy shall be filled by the election of a director from the district in which the vacancy occurs; or the board of directors may call a special meeting of the members in that district to fill the vacancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13278.

The directors shall elect from their number a president and one or more vice presidents. They shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who need not be directors or members of the association; and they may combine the two latter offices and unite both functions and titles in one person. The treasurer may be a bank or any depository and, as such, shall not be considered as an officer, but as a function of the board of directors. In such case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, excepting that the funds shall be deposited only as and where authorized by the board of directors. Any vacancy in any office, other than that of director, shall be filled by the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13279.

An association may provide a fair remuneration for the time actually spent by its officers and directors in its service and for the service of the members of its executive committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Removal of Officers [13290. - 13293.]

13290.
